Alaska statutes. Title 3. Agriculture, Animals, and Food.
Chapter 30. Fences.

Cross references. —

For injury to livestock by a railroad, see AS

42.30.150

—

42.30.190

.

Collateral references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d, Animals, §§ 48-50

35A Am. Jur. 2d, Fences, § 1 et seq.

65 Am. Jur. 2d, Railroads, §§ 80-88.

3B C.J.S., Animals, §§ 270-275, 382-386

36A C.J.S., Fences, § 1 et seq.

Liability for injury to trespassing stock from poisonous substances on the premises. 12 ALR3d 1103.

Fence as nuisance. 80 ALR3d 962.

Sec. 03.30.010.
What constitutes legal fence. [Repealed, § 3 ch 55 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 03.30.020.
Duty to keep barbed wire fences in repair.

A person having a barbed wire fence shall keep it in good repair. When a domesticated animal is killed or injured by coming in contact with a barbed wire fence that is not at the time of injury kept in substantial compliance with this section and AS

03.30.030

, the owner of the animal may recover from the owner of the fence a sum equal to the amount of damages sustained in the killing or injury to the animal.

History.

(§ 33-4-2 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 03.30.030.
Fence as nuisance.

Any wire fence so dilapidated as to be of no practical use as a fence that is a menace to livestock is a public nuisance and may be abated by a court in a proceeding instituted for that purpose.

History.

(§ 33-4-3 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 03.30.040.
Liability of owner of animals damaging enclosed land or crops. [Repealed, § 3 ch 55 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 03.30.050.
Impounding animals breaking into enclosed area. [Repealed, §
3 ch 55 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 03.30.060.
Failure to close roadside gate used for retaining livestock.

A person failing to close a roadside gate after opening the same is presumed to be negligent and liable for all consequent damage upon proof thereof. For the purposes of this section, a roadside gate is a contrivance located alongside or near a public or private road made for the purpose of passing through a fence that is used for or intended to be used for the retention of livestock.

History.

(§ 1 ch 186 SLA 1959)